Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that it has been and continues to be the law of this state that a person may not vote in an election in Washington and an election in any other state if the election date is the same for both states. The legislature intends to affirm and clarify this law, and enacts section 2 of this act to abrogate the decision of the Washington court of appeals in State v. Padrta, No. 59737-3-II (January 6, 2026) and to immediately correct its erroneous interpretation in order to prevent confusion during the 2026 primary and general elections. This amendment is intended to be curative in nature.Sec. 2. RCW 29A.84.650 and 2005 c 243 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Any person who intentionally votes or attempts to vote in this state more than once ((at any))in the same election, or who intentionally votes or attempts to vote in both this state and another state ((at any))in the same election, is guilty of a class C felony.(b) For purposes of this section, the term "election" refers to any general, primary, or special election. An election is the "same election" if the election date is the same, regardless of the candidates, offices, issues, or measures on the ballot and regardless of the date on which ballots are mailed or returned.(c) When a special election is held in conjunction with a general election or primary election, it is not the "same election" for purposes of this section, and otherwise qualified voters may vote in both the special election and the general or primary election held on the same day.(2) Any person who recklessly or negligently violates this section commits a class 1 civil infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---